Nebraska, session 109, LB708.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB708 LB708
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 85-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1504 The state is hereby divided into six community college areas
as follows:
(1) The Western Community College Area shall consist of the
following counties: Sioux, Dawes, Sheridan, Box Butte, Scotts Bluff,
Banner, Kimball, Morrill, Cheyenne, Garden, Deuel, and Grant and the
voting districts of Merriam, Russell, King, Mother Lake, Cody, Barley,
Gillaspie, Lackey, and Calf Creek in Cherry County as such voting
districts existed on July 1, 1975;
(2) The Mid-Plains Community College Area shall consist of the
following counties: Cherry except as provided in subdivision (1) of this
section, Hooker, Thomas, Blaine, Loup, Arthur, McPherson, Logan, Custer,
Keith, Lincoln, Perkins, Chase, Hayes, Frontier, Dundy, Hitchcock, and
Red Willow, and Dawson;
(3) The Northeast Community College Area shall consist of the
following counties: Keya Paha, Brown, Rock, Boyd, Holt, Garfield,
Wheeler, Knox, Cedar, Antelope, Pierce, Madison, Wayne, Stanton, Dixon,
Dakota, Thurston, Burt, and Cuming and the precincts of North Oakland,
South Oakland, Ashland, North Branch, Shell Creek, and Midland in Boone
County as such precincts existed on July 1, 1975;
(4) The Central Community College Area shall consist of the
following counties: Valley, Greeley, Platte, Colfax, Sherman, Howard,
Nance, Merrick, Polk, Butler, Dawson, Buffalo, Hall, Hamilton, Gosper,
Phelps, Kearney, Adams, Clay, Furnas, Harlan, Franklin, Webster, and
Nuckolls and all of Boone County except as provided in subdivision (3) of
this section;
(5) The Southeast Community College Area shall consist of the
following counties: Saunders, Cass, York, Seward, Lancaster, Otoe,
Fillmore, Saline, Thayer, Jefferson, Gage, Johnson, Nemaha, Pawnee, and
Richardson; and
-2-

LB708 LB708
2025 2025
(6) The Metropolitan Community College Area shall consist of the
following counties: Dodge, Washington, Douglas, and Sarpy.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-